Hawaii statutes.
§200-7 Waiver of mooring charges.
The department shall waive the mooring charge for:

(1) Any and all sea scout craft using moorings
belonging to or controlled by the State, when moorings are available as
determined by the department; provided that the craft are owned and used
exclusively for the purpose of regular organized sea scout groups; and

(2) Any and all sailing school vessels. [L 1991, c
272, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 188, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next